src/fkv-lex.txt
! Kven transducer
! ===============

! Beware of remnants from the Finnish file
! Take nothing at face value!

Multichar_Symbols
 +N +A +Adv +V
 +Pron +CS +CC +Interj +Pcle
 +Pers +Dem +Interr +Refl +Recipr +Rel +Indef
 +Sg +Pl +Nom +Acc +Gen +Ine +Ill +Ela +Abe +All +Abl
 +Ess +Tra +Ins +Com +Par
 +Comp +Superl +Clt
 +Pass +Ind +Prs +Prt +Imprt +Cond +Pot
 +Inf  +PrsPrc +PrfPrc +Inf3
 +CLB +PUNCT +HYPH
 p1 t1 k1
 i2 i3 14 i5
 %^V %^A %^O %^U

 X1 X2 X3 X4 X5 X6 X7 X8 X9
 Y1 Y2 Y3 Y4 Y5 Y6 Y7 Y8 Y9
 Z1 Z2 Z3 Z4 Z5 Z6 Z7 Z8 Z9
 %^TES
 %^¤

! Documenting the diacritics
! Note! This is for Finnish, and should be replaced.
! A better system would be the faroese one.
! X1 WeG
! X2 WeG and a:0 sodissa
! X4 WeG matto - maton
! Y1 WeG and a:o rannoissa
! Y2 a:0 koira - koiria
! Y3 a:o kala - kaloja
! Y4 ':0 parfait'n : parfait
! Y5 m:n and i:0 lumi - lunta
! Y6 s:t and i:e käsi - käteen
! Y7 e:0 in cns stems käsi - kättä
! Z1 e:i in nom.sg
! Z2 i:0 i-stems in par,gen pl

! i2 plural i of nouns
! i3 past tense i of verbs
! i4 superlative i of adjectives
! i5 i in conditional isi of verbs
! ^¤ potecting against e:i word-finally (nalle, liike)

! =================================================
! Basic lexica, pointing to the other lexicon files
! =================================================
  
LEXICON Root
 NounRoot ;
 ProperNoun ;
 AdjectiveRoot ;
 VerbRoot ;
 Adverb ;
 Subjunction ;
 Conjunction ;
 Preposition ;
 Interjection ;
! Pronoun ;
! Numeral ;
! Punctuation ;






LEXICON K
 # ;
 +Clt:%>k%^O # ;
 +Clt:%>h%^An # ;
 +Clt:%>p%^A # ;
 +Clt:%>p%^As # ;
 +Clt:%>kin # ;
 +Clt:%>k%^A%^An # ;
